North Dakota, session 69, SB2078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 25-01.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-01.1-07. Rules or policies for procedure and administration of institutions.
The supervising department shall make all necessary rules or policies for its own procedure and for
the general administration, supervision, and management of the institutions under its control and
management.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 25-02-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-02-01.1. Maintenance of state hospital accreditation - Governing body membership -
Rulemaking authorityAuthority.
1. The department of health and human services shall seek appropriations and resources
sufficient to ensure maintenance of the state hospital's accreditation by the joint commission
and certification by the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services or by similar accrediting
and certifying organizations and agencies possessing hospital standards recognized by the
health care industry and accepted by the department.
2. The department, in consultation with the state hospital, shall create a state hospital governing
body and shall by rules, policies, or bylaws describe the powers and duties of the governing
body. The department shall compensate members not employed by the department in the
amount of one hundred dollars per day and reimburse members for expenses incurred in
attending meetings in the amounts provided by sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09.
3. The governing body must be composed of the commissioner of the department of health and
human services or designee; the director of the division of behavioral health of the department
or designee, who shall serve as chairman of the governing body; the state hospital
superintendent; the state hospital medical director; a representative of the department's fiscal
administration division; a behavioral health consumer selected by the mental health
association; and a legislator selected by the legislative management. The governing body may
include other persons as appointed by the governing body.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 25-02-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-02-03. Object of state hospital.
The state hospital is an institution for mental diseases serving specialized populations of individuals
with severe mental illness, including individuals with a substance use disorder. The state hospital is one
component of the North Dakota mental health delivery system and serves as a resource to
community-based treatment programs. The state hospital shall, pursuant to rules or policies adopted by
the department of health and human services, receive and care for all eligible individuals with severe

S. B. NO. 2078 - PAGE 2
mental illness, including individuals with a substance use disorder, residing within this state in
accordance with this title, and may furnish to those individuals all needed food, shelter, treatment, and
support.

S. B. NO. 2078 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2078.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 6 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State